Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Article 7 Parentage by Assisted Reproduction

15-8.1-701.
Scope.

This article does not apply to the birth of a child conceived by sexual intercourse or assisted reproduction under a surrogacy agreement under article 8 of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-702.
Parental status of donor.

A donor is not a parent of a child conceived through assisted reproduction.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a person who provides a gamete or gametes or an embryo or embryos to be used for assisted reproduction for the person’s spouse is a parent of the resulting child.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-703.
Parentage of child of assisted reproduction.

An individual who consents under §

15-8.1-704

to assisted reproduction by another individual with the intent to be a parent of a child conceived by the assisted reproduction is a parent of the child.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-704.
Consent to assisted reproduction.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, the consent described in §

15-8.1-703

, must be in a record signed by the individual giving birth to a child conceived by assisted reproduction and the individual who intends to be a parent of the child.

In the absence of a record pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, before, on, or after the birth of the child, a court may adjudicate an individual as the parent of a child, if it finds by a preponderance of the evidence that:

Prior to conception or birth of the child, the parties entered into an agreement that they both intended to be the parents of the child; or

The parties resided with the child and assumed the duties and responsibilities of parentage.

The court may order after hearing that the parties be listed on the birth certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-705.
Limitation on spouse’s dispute of parentage.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a spouse may commence a proceeding to challenge his or her parentage of a child born by assisted reproduction during the marriage within two (2) years after the birth of the child if the court finds that the spouse did not consent to the assisted reproduction before, on, or after the birth of the child or that the spouse withdrew consent pursuant to §

15-8.1-706

.

A spouse or the individual who gave birth to the child may commence a proceeding to challenge the spouse’s parentage of a child born by assisted reproduction at any time if the court determines:

The spouse neither provided a gamete for, nor consented to, the assisted reproduction;

The spouse and the individual who gave birth to the child have not cohabited since the probable time of assisted reproduction; and

The spouse never openly held out the child as his or her child.

This section shall apply to a spouse’s dispute of parentage even if the marriage is declared invalid after assisted reproduction occurs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-706.
Effect of dissolution of marriage or withdrawal of consent.

If a marriage is dissolved by final decree of divorce before transfer or implantation of gametes or embryos, the former spouse is not a parent of the resulting child unless the former spouse consented in a signed record, with notice to the other spouse and the individual giving birth, that, if assisted reproduction were to occur after a divorce, the former spouse would be a parent of the child.

Consent of an individual to assisted reproduction, pursuant to §

15-8.1-704

, may be withdrawn by that person in a signed record, with notice to the individual giving birth and any other intended parent, before transfer or implantation of gametes or embryos. An individual who withdraws consent under this subsection is not a parent of the resulting child.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-707.
Parental status of a deceased individual.

If an individual who intends to be a parent of a child conceived by assisted reproduction dies during the period between the transfer of a gamete or embryo and the birth of the child, the individual’s death does not preclude the establishment of the individual’s parentage of the child if the individual otherwise would be a parent of the child pursuant to this article.

If an individual who consented in a record to assisted reproduction by the individual giving birth to the child dies before transfer or implantation of gametes or embryos, the deceased individual is not a parent of a child conceived by assisted reproduction unless:

The deceased individual consented in a record that if assisted reproduction were to occur after the death of the deceased individual, the deceased individual would be a parent of the child; or

The deceased individual’s intent to be a parent of a child conceived by assisted reproduction after the individual’s death is established by a preponderance of the evidence.

An individual is a parent of a child conceived by assisted reproduction under subsection (b)(1) of this section, only if:

The embryo is in utero not later than thirty-six (36) months after the individual’s death; or

The child is born not later than forty-five (45) months after the individual’s death.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-708.
Parentage orders of children born of assisted reproduction.

An individual consenting to assisted reproduction consistent with this article, an individual who is a parent pursuant to §§

15-8.1-703

and

15-8.1-704

, or the individual giving birth, may commence a proceeding in the family court, before, on, or after birth of a resulting child, to obtain a parentage order or determination of parentage:

Declaring that the intended parent or parents are the parent or parents of the resulting child and ordering that parental rights and responsibilities vest exclusively in the intended parent or parents immediately upon the birth of the child;

Sealing the record from the public to protect the privacy of the child and the parties;

Designating the contents of the birth certificate and directing the department of health to designate the intended parent or parents as the parent or parents of the child; or

For any relief that the court determines necessary and proper.

A proceeding under this section may be commenced before, on, or after the birth of the child.

Neither the donor, the state, nor the department of health is a necessary party to a proceeding under this section.

The family court shall forward a certified copy of the order issued pursuant to this section to the department of health and to the intended parents or their representative.

The intended parent or parents and any resulting child shall have access to the court records relating to the proceeding at any time.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-709.
Laboratory error.

If due to a laboratory or clinical error, the child is not genetically related to either the intended parent or parents or any donor who donated to the intended parent or parents, the intended parent or parents are the parents of the child unless otherwise determined by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.